California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) A county may contract with the local office of the public guardian to receive and manage income and benefits for persons with a mental health condition, regardless of whether the persons are under conservatorship. The case management services described in this section shall be provided only with the consent of the client. The public guardian, under the contracts, may perform functions intended to meet the goals of the community support system listed in Section 5683, and may also include, but not be limited to, all of the following case management services:

(1) Outreach and casefinding to locate persons with a mental health condition in
 need of services.

(2) Establishing liaison with charitable organizations which
 serve persons with a mental health condition.

(3) Assistance in applying for and obtaining public assistance benefits for which they are eligible.

(b) Any office of the public guardian contracting with the county to provide these management services shall maintain a record of those individuals being assisted, including information about whether the individual is under conservatorship, the type of service assistance provided by the office of the public guardian, and any agency with which the office of the public guardian is coordinating efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 27.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5686.

If a county believes that a person with a mental health disability may be unable to manage their SSI/SSP funds, the county mental health program shall advise the person that they may have a trusted family member, relative, or friend designated as their representative payee under the SSI/SSP program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 28.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5686.5.

In order to make the most efficient use of the public funds appropriated for this purpose, counties are encouraged to maximize the use of existing public and private community resources. If voluntarily requested by the client, the community support agency shall help the client learn to manage his or her own money. Any SSI/SSP money, or other personal funds, if managed by the program or by the local office of the public guardian, shall, at all times, be considered as the client’s money. Nothing in this section, however, shall prevent a client from purchasing residential care with SSI/SSP funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 49.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5688.6.

All funds appropriated for persons who are homeless with a mental health disability that have been determined to be unexpended and
 unencumbered two years after the date the funds were appropriated shall be transferred to the Department of Housing and Community Development. The amount of transfer shall be determined after the State Department of Health Care Services settles county cost reports for the fiscal year the funds were appropriated. The funds transferred to the Department of Housing and Community Development shall be administered in accordance with that department’s Special Users Housing Rehabilitation or Emergency Shelter programs to provide low-income transitional and long-term housing for persons who are homeless with a mental health disability. Special priority shall be given to project proposals for persons who are homeless with a mental health disability in the same county from which the funds for the support of the community support system were originally
 allocated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 29.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Community Vocational Rehabilitation System [5690. - 5693.5.]

5690.

It is the intent of the Legislature to, encourage the establishment in each county of a system of community vocational rehabilitation and employment services, for persons with serious psychiatric disabilities. It is further the intent of the Legislature that there be a range of available services whenever possible in each county based on the principle that work is an essential element in the local mental health treatment and support system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 157.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5691.

(a) A county may implement the community vocational rehabilitation system described in this chapter with existing county allocations, funds available from the Department of Rehabilitation and other state and federal agencies.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that on an annual basis five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or 17 percent, whichever is less, of the total federal funds available to the State of California pursuant to Section 611 of the Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance Act, Public Law 100-77 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 290aa) shall be used to fund services pursuant to this chapter for persons who are homeless with a mental disability
 and those at risk of becoming homeless who have been identified pursuant to Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 5680).

Counties may not use these funds to provide services, including, but not limited to, vocational services, which could be funded by the Department of Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 30.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5692.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall, to the extent resources are available, have responsibility for the provision of technical assistance, maximizing federal revenue, and ensuring coordination with other state agencies including implementing and coordinating interagency agreements between the Department of Rehabilitation and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 138.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5692.5.

Programs that constitute the community vocational rehabilitation system are of the following types:

(a) Prevocational programs should be, but are not limited to, components of day treatment programs, socialization and activity centers, board-and-care facilities, and skilled nursing-special treatment programs. Prevocational programs may use individual and group counseling, educational groups, volunteer service programs, and other modalities to emphasize to individuals the value of work and their right to employment. 

(b) Vocational programs providing linkage and coordination for the system and which provide the following: 

(1) Information, outreach, and referral services which provide ongoing liaison with assessment prevocational programs. 

(2) Intake and evaluation services which may use vocational testing and analysis of work history to identify vocational strengths, weaknesses, and needs. The assessment findings should be used by the client and the program to negotiate the goals and objectives of an individual vocational plan.

(3) Work experience programs which consist of time-limited work opportunities that enable participants to develop work skills and establish a work history. These programs may include, but not be limited to, agency-operated businesses, work placements in the community, or other activities that provide a realistic work environment. 

(4) Individual and group counseling services which are separated from the work experience component; individual counseling to assist clients in resolving problems related to the work situation, to update and renegotiate the individual vocational plan, and to assist clients with nonwork-related problems that affect their participation in the program; group counseling to address Social Security Administration rules and regulations: the effects of medication on work performance, the relationship between work and mental health, attributes and attitudes necessary for successful employment, job-seeking skills, and other related topics. 

(5) Job development, placement, and referral services which assist clients in the following areas: obtaining competitive employment; admission to job training or education programs; referral to the Department of Rehabilitation; agency operated competitive employment programs; governmental and private sector affirmative action hiring programs for the disabled; or other specialized employment programs. If employment, training, or education programs are not suitable for a client, the client should be actively referred back to a prevocational program or other mental health program that best meets his or her current needs. 

(6) Support services which may include peer support groups and job clubs to assist clients in obtaining and maintaining employment; ongoing client counseling and placement followup; employer training, consultation, and placement followup services; and consultation services to prevocational programs. 

(7) The preferred method to deliver the vocational rehabilitation services described in this section is supported employment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5693 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 161.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5693.

The following principles should guide development of community vocational rehabilitation systems:

(a) Work: 

(1) Work should be meaningful, necessary, and have value to the individual performing it. 

(2) For individuals participating in vocational programs every effort should be made to pay them the minimum wage. However, in all cases, wages paid shall be in compliance with all relevant state and federal labor laws. 

(3) That work will result in the development of attributes that will enhance further employability. 

(b) Staff: 

(1) Staffing patterns at all levels should reflect the cultural, linguistic, ethnic, racial, disability, sexual, and other social characteristics of the community the program serves. 

(2) All participating programs should take affirmative action to encourage the application and employment of consumers and former consumers of the mental health system at all program levels. 

(3) Programs should be designed to use multidisciplinary professional consultation and staff to meet the specific needs of clients. 

(4) When operating a business enterprise, programs should employ individuals with the business, management, supervisorial, trade, and occupational skills necessary for successful operation. 

(5) Programs should, where appropriate, employ paraprofessionals. 

(6) Programs should develop and implement staff training and development plans for personnel at all levels. 

(c) Facilities: 

(1) The individual elements of the system should, where possible, be in separate facilities. 

(2) Facilities housing vocational and employment programs should be modeled on competitive businesses operating in the community. 

(3) Facilities shall be in compliance with all relevant state and federal safety, health, and accessibility regulations. 

(d) System: 

(1) Counties developing a community vocational rehabilitation system should utilize existing program resources to develop prevocational programs and a referral base for vocational programs. 

(2) Individual programs operate most effectively within the context of a complete system. Counties undertaking development of a community vocational rehabilitation system should commit themselves to the implementation of regionally integrated prevocational and vocational programs. 

(3) Rural counties, where appropriate, should be encouraged to develop intercounty systems, or to integrate their programs with programs serving other target populations. 

(4) The system should have the capacity to deliver services tailored to individual needs. If a program is found to be unsuitable for a client at a specific time, an explanation will be provided to the client and he or she shall be referred to a more suitable program and encouraged to reapply. The system should have policies designed to meet changing client needs and to work with individuals over time to develop their vocational potential.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5694 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 162.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5693.2.

Counties undertaking development of a community vocational rehabilitation system are encouraged to establish an advisory group consisting of primary consumers, parents, representatives from the business community, and other individuals who may provide assistance in developing the system.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5695 (as added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1286) by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1374, Sec. 33.   Effective October 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

5693.5.

The director shall provide technical assistance to those counties developing a community vocational rehabilitation system. In the event that the department lacks sufficient resources to provide technical assistance, it may be provided by contract.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5696 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 163.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Self-Help [5694. - 5694.5.]

5694.

A community support program for persons who are homeless with a mental health disability should also assist its clients to establish self-help groups and peer counseling. An agency should offer each client a
 written individualized service plan that will specify the services to be provided as a result of discussions with the client and the rights of the client, as well as the expected results or outcomes of the services. A program should encourage each client to include family members, friends, the client’s primary therapist, and the client’s physician in the development of the client’s individualized service plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 31.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5694.5.

The counties may utilize designated mental health funding pursuant to this part for establishing and maintaining any client self-help mental health projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 164.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Policy Initiatives for Children with Serious Emotional Disturbance [5694.7. - 5694.7.]

5694.7.

When the director of behavioral health in a county is notified pursuant to Section 319.1 or 635.1, or Section 7572.5 of the Government Code about a specific case, the county behavioral health director shall assign the responsibility either directly or through contract with a private provider, to review the information and assess whether or not the child has serious emotional disturbance as well as to determine the level of involvement in the case needed to ensure access to appropriate mental health treatment services and whether appropriate treatment is available through the minor’s own
 resources, those of the family or another private party, including a third-party payer, or through another agency, and to ensure access to services available within the county’s program. This determination shall be submitted in writing to the notifying agency within 30 days. If in the course of evaluating the minor, the county behavioral health director determines that the minor may be dangerous, the county behavioral health director may request the court to direct counsel not to reveal information to the minor relating to the name and address of the person who prepared the subject report. If appropriate treatment is not available within the county’s Bronzan-McCorquodale program, this section does not prevent the court from ordering treatment directly or through a family’s private resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 33.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Regional Facilities for Wards with Serious Emotional Disturbance [5695. - 5697.5.]

5695.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) The Legislature has declared its intent to provide, at the local level, a range of appropriate mental health services for minors with serious emotional disturbance. These programs include both outpatient and nonsecure residential care and treatment.

(b) The Legislature recognizes that, while some minors will benefit from this care and treatment, there exists a population within that group who have been adjudged wards of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602 who have serious emotional disturbance and by lack of behavior control and offense history,
 are not benefiting from existing programs, including the 24-hour facilities currently being operated under juvenile court law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2).

(c) The Legislature finds that there are no treatment facilities specifically designed and operated to provide both intensive mental health treatment and behavior control to this population of wards in a secure setting. These wards have not been successful in open residential care and when confined to traditional juvenile justice system facilities, disrupt programming, endanger themselves and others, and require intensive supervision including occasional isolation and provision of a one-to-one supervision ratio. The behavior and needs of this population affect the ability of the existing facilities to meet the program needs of the remainder of
 the population which is more appropriately detained or committed there.

(d) Psychiatric hospitals frequently refuse to accept these wards because of their offense history or their extremely disruptive behavior, because they do not always meet medical necessity for acute admission, or because the lengths of stay in inpatient programs are too limited in duration. Because of these problems,
 minors with serious emotional disturbance who have been adjudged to be wards pursuant to Section 602 do not receive the level of mental health care necessary to interrupt the cycle of emotional disturbance leading to assaultive or self-destructive behavior.

(e) The Legislature therefore declares its intent to establish regional facilities which will provide an additional dispositional resource to the juvenile justice system, and which will demonstrate the feasibility and effectiveness of providing the services described in this chapter to minors with serious emotional disturbance who have been adjudged wards of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602 and whose physical and mental treatment needs require a secure facility and program. It is also the intent of the Legislature to secure for the minors committed to
 such a facility, the protection, custody, care, treatment, and guidance that is consistent with the purpose of the juvenile court law (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 35.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5695.2.

There may be established, on a regional basis, secure facilities which are physically and programmatically designed for the commitment and ongoing treatment of minors with serious emotional disturbance who have been adjudged wards of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602.
 A minor shall not be committed to the facility for more than 18 months from the date of admission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 36.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5695.5.

A board of directors for a facility shall be established to provide oversight and direction to the design, implementation, and operation of the facility in order to ensure adherence to the statement of legislative intent in Section 5590 and to the overall goals and objectives of the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 170.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5695.7.

(a) The board of directors shall be composed of the chief probation officer and the local mental health directors of each of the participating counties. 

(b) The regional facilities shall operate under the administration of the onsite director who shall be directly responsible to the board of directors for adherence to all policies and procedures established by the board and to the intent of the Legislature stated in Section 5695.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 52.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5696.

Prior to the opening of a regional facility, the board of directors shall develop written admission criteria, approved by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, for those minors who are most at risk of entering the adult criminal justice system as offenders who have mental health disorders and are at high risk of committing predatory and violent crimes, including, but not limited to, the following requirements:

(a) The minor is at the time of commitment between 12 and 18 years of age, the minor has been adjudged to be a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 602, and the minor’s custody has been placed under the supervision of a probation officer
 pursuant to Section 727.

(b) The ward has serious emotional disturbance as is evidenced by a diagnosis from the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and evidences behavior inappropriate to the ward’s age according to expected developmental norms. Additionally, all of the following must be present:

(1) The behavior presents a danger to the community or self and requires intensive supervision and treatment, but the ward is not amenable to other private or public residential treatment programs because the ward’s behavior requires a secure setting.

(2) The symptomology is both severe and frequent.

(3) The
 inappropriate behavior is persistent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 37.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5696.2.

No ward shall be admitted to any regional facility described in this chapter who meets any of the following criteria:

(a) The ward has a primary substance abuse problem. 

(b) The ward has a primary developmental disability. 

(c) The ward requires an acute psychiatric hospital setting. 

(d) The ward can benefit from or requires a level of treatment or confinement not provided at the facility. 

(e) The ward suffers from a medical condition which requires ongoing nursing and medical care, beyond the level that the program can provide. 

(f) The ward is under conservatorship established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 170.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5696.5.

Prior to the opening of a facility, the board of directors shall establish written program standards and policies and procedures, approved by the Division of Juvenile Facilities that address and include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) A staffing number and pattern that meets the special behavior, supervision, treatment, health, and educational needs of the population described in this chapter. Staff shall be qualified to provide intensive treatment and services and shall include, at a minimum:

(1) A project or clinical director, a psychiatrist or psychologist, a social worker, a registered nurse, and a recreation or occupational
 therapist.

(2) A pediatrician and a dentist, and a licensed marriage and family therapist or a licensed professional clinical counselor, or both of those professionals, on an as-needed basis.

(3) Educational staff in sufficient number and with the qualifications needed to meet the population served.

(4) Child care staff in sufficient numbers and with the qualifications needed to meet the special needs of the population.

(b) Programming to meet the needs of all wards admitted, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Physical examinations on admission and ongoing health care.

(2) Appropriate and closely
 monitored use of all behavioral management techniques.

(3) The establishment of written, individual treatment and educational plans and goals for each ward within 10 days of admission and which are updated at least quarterly.

(4) Written discharge planning that addresses each ward’s continued treatment, educational, and supervision needs.

(5) Regular, written progress records regarding the care and treatment of each ward.

(6) Regular and structured treatment of all wards, including, but not limited to, individual, group and family therapy, psychological testing, medication, and occupational, or recreational therapy.

(7) Access to neurological testing and laboratory work as needed.

(8) The opportunity for regular family contact and involvement.

(9) A periodic review of the continued need for treatment within the facility.

(10) Educational programming, including special education as needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 46.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5696.7.

Wards shall be referred for admission to the director of a regional facility following screening and approval through a joint mental health and probation screening committee in the county which refers the minor. This screening process shall be defined in the standards, policies, and procedures governing the operation of the facility. The probation officer shall, in consultation and cooperation with the county mental health staff, process the ward’s admission to the facility and implement the discharge plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 170.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5697.

The regional board of directors shall contract with the county in which the regional facility is located for the provision of a public education program which will meet the educational requirements and needs of the wards admitted to the facility.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 167) and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 170.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5697.2.

The board of directors of a regional facility shall submit to the Director of the Youth Authority, a report which includes, at a minimum, a description of the regional facility, the population to be served, criteria for admission and release, program goals and services, staffing, a postrelease component, appropriate educational programming, an annual evaluation component, and a proposed budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 170.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5697.5.

The Director of the Youth Authority, in conjunction with the Director of Mental Health, shall adopt rules and regulations to establish, monitor, and enforce minimum standards for regional facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 170.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. System of Care for Children and Youth with Serious Emotional Disturbance [5698. - 5698.]

5698.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage in each county a system of care for children and youth with serious emotional disturbance. This system of care should be based upon the following principles:

(a) A defined range of interagency services, blended programs and program standards that facilitate appropriate service delivery in the least restrictive environment as close to home as possible. The system should use available and accessible intensive home and school-based alternatives.

(b) A defined mechanism to ensure that services are child centered and family focused with parental participation in
 all aspects of the planning and delivery of service.

(c) A formalized multiagency policy making council and an interagency case management services council. The roles and responsibilities of these councils should be specified in existing interagency agreements or memoranda of understanding, or both.

(d) A defined interagency case management system designed to facilitate services to the defined target population.

(e) A defined mechanism to ensure that services are culturally competent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 39.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. Case Management for Children With Serious Emotional Disturbance [5699. - 5699.5.]

5699.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That mental health case management services required for children with serious emotional disturbance are different than these services for clients with mental health disorders described in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5670).

(2) That mental health case management services for children with serious emotional disturbance are not defined in statute.

(3) That the development of mental health case management for these children would ensure comprehensive appraisal and utilization of the most appropriate resources within the
 children’s environment, as well as the maintenance and strengthening of family ties.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the development of mental health case management services for children with serious emotional disturbance who are separated or at risk of being separated from their families and require mental health treatment, to the extent resources are available. It is further the intent of the Legislature that mental health case management for children with serious emotional disturbance in this state be developed in accordance with the definitions and guidelines contained in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 103.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5699.1.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5692.5 (as renumbered from 5678.1 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 51.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5699.2.

Children identified for case management services under this section shall be minors under 18 years of age described in Section 5600.3 with serious emotional disturbance and who also meet one or more of the following criteria:

(a) A child who is a ward or dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602 and is placed out-of-home.

(b) A child who is a special education pupil defined in paragraph 8 of subdivision (b) of Section 300.5 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and is receiving residential care pursuant to an individual educational program. This section also includes
 special education pupils through age 21 identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56026 of the Education Code.

(c) An inpatient in a psychiatric hospital, psychiatric health facility, or residential treatment facility receiving services either on a voluntary or involuntary basis.

(d) An outpatient receiving intensive non-24-hour mental health treatment, such as day treatment or crisis services who is “at risk” of psychiatric hospitalization or out-of-home placement for residential treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 40.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5699.3.

“Individual treatment plan” means a plan that includes all of the following:

(a) An assessment of the minor’s specific capabilities and problems. 

(b) A statement of specific, time-limited objectives for improving the capabilities and resolving the problems. The objectives shall be stated in measurable terms which allow measurement of progress. 

(c) A schedule of the type and amount of services to achieve treatment plan objectives, including identification of the provider or providers of service responsible for attaining each objective. 

(d) A schedule of regular periodic review and reassessment to ascertain that planned services have been provided and that objectives have been reached within the times specified.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5699.1 (as renumbered from 5678.3 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 54.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5699.4.

On and after January 1, 1987, any county may provide case management services for children with serious emotional disturbance pursuant to this chapter. The case management services may include all of the following:

(a) Development of an individual treatment plan for each child. The plan shall be collaboratively prepared and reviewed and modified, if necessary, at least annually, by one representative of the mental health program, the parents, legal guardian, conservator, or court appointed social worker or probation officer, and, where appropriate, the minor. 

(b) Assignment of a mental health case manager to each child. The duties of the mental health case manager may include, but not be limited to, all of the following: 

(1) Coordinating an ecological assessment of the child’s needs which evaluates the child both individually and in relation to his or her family, school, and community environments. 

(2) Developing, implementing, monitoring, and reviewing each individual treatment plan that addresses the identified needs. 

(3) Linking and arranging or providing for the needed services. 

(4) Monitoring the adequacy of the services provided. 

(5) Advocating for the minor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5699.2 (as renumbered from 5678.5 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 55.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5699.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use of state funds to provide services under this chapter or to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5678.6 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 141.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Financial Provisions [5700. - 5717.]

5700.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that mental health services provided by county mental health programs are funded from the following general categories or sources of public funding: 

(1) Funds received by counties from the Local Revenue Fund and county funds necessary to meet the federal maintenance of effort requirements. 

(2) Funds from appropriations made to the department or for which the department is responsible for administering, which are designated for local mental health services. 

(3) Reimbursements through the Medi-Cal program for mental health services to Medi-Cal eligible individuals receiving mental health services from county mental health programs. 

(4) Funds from county or local appropriations which are designated for local mental health services. 

(b) The Legislature further recognizes that there are procedures and requirements which are unique to each category set forth in subdivision (a), as well as procedures and requirements which apply to all four categories.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.

(a) To achieve equity of funding, available funding for local mental health programs beyond the funding provided pursuant to Section 17601 shall be distributed to cities, counties, and cities and counties pursuant to the procedures described in subdivision (c) of Section 17606.05.

(b) Funding provided pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, funding provided pursuant to subdivision (c), and funding provided for future pilot projects shall be exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) Effective in the
 2012–13 fiscal year and each year thereafter:

(1) The State Department of Health
 Care Services shall annually identify from mental health block grant funds provided by the federal government, the maximum amount that federal law and regulation permit to be allocated to counties and cities and counties pursuant to this subdivision. This section shall apply to any federal mental health block grant funds in excess of the following:

(A) Funds
 for departmental support.

(B) Amounts awarded to counties and cities and counties for children’s systems of care programs pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850).

(C) Amounts appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this part.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), annually the State Department of Health Care Services shall allocate to counties and cities and counties the funds identified in paragraph (1), not to exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000) in any year. The allocations shall be proportional to each county’s and each city
 and county’s percentage of the forty million dollars ($40,000,000) in Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax funds that were allocated to local mental health programs in the 1991–92 fiscal year.

(3) Monthly, the Controller shall allocate funds from the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund to counties and cities and counties for mental health services. Allocations shall be made to each county or city and county in the same percentages as described in paragraph (2), until the total of the funds allocated to all counties in each year pursuant to paragraph (2) and this paragraph reaches forty million dollars ($40,000,000).

(4) Funds allocated to counties and cities and counties pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) shall not be subject to Section 17606.05.

(5) Funds that are available for allocation
 in any year in excess of the forty million dollar ($40,000,000) limits described in paragraph (2) or (3) shall be deposited into the Mental Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund.

(6) Nothing in this section is intended to, nor shall it, change the base allocation of any city, county, or city and county as provided in Section 17601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 139.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.1.

Notwithstanding Section 5701, the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California and the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, may utilize funding from the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration Block Grant, awarded to the State Department of Health Care Services, above the funding level provided in federal fiscal year 1998, for the development of innovative programs for identified target populations, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 9.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.2.

(a) The State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall maintain records of any transfer of funds or state hospital beds made pursuant to Chapter 1341 of the Statutes of 1991.

(b) Commencing with the 1991–92 fiscal year, the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall maintain records that set forth that portion of each county’s allocation of state mental health moneys that represent the dollar equivalent attributed to each county’s state hospital beds or bed days, or both, that were allocated as of May 1, 1991. The State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall